Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 3 Underground Storage of Gas

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Board of Natural Resources pertaining to deep drilling for oil and gas, §

12-4-40

et seq.

46-4-50.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Underground Gas Storage Act.”

History.

Code 1933, § 93-801, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46.

46-4-51.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Gas” means natural gas or manufactured gas, or a combination of both.

“Gas utility” means any individual, firm, corporation, organization, or other entity holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission authorizing the transportation, distribution, or sale of gas.

“Underground reservoir” means any subsurface sand, strata, formation, aquifer, cavern, or void, whether natural or artificially created, which is suitable for the injection and storage of gas therein and for the withdrawal of gas therefrom.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-802, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.

46-4-52.
Declaration of public purpose.

The underground storage of gas, which permits the building of reserves for orderly withdrawal in periods of peak demand, will promote the economic development of the State of Georgia and provide for more economical distribution of gas to the domestic, commercial, and industrial consumers of this state, thereby serving the public interest. Therefore, the underground storage of gas by a gas utility is recognized and declared to be affected with a public interest; and all of the property used in such underground storage is recognized and declared to be devoted to public use.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-803, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.

46-4-53.
Application to commission by gas utility for order approving utilization or operation of underground reservoir; hearing on application generally; giving notice of hearing.

Any gas utility desiring to utilize or operate an underground reservoir shall first apply to the Public Service Commission for an order approving the proposed project. The application shall include:

A legal description of the roads, grounds, waters, buildings, and other improvements of any kind under which such underground reservoir is proposed, together with a map thereof;

A map showing the location of existing and proposed stations, wells, fixtures, machinery, and other facilities necessary for the construction, maintenance, and operation of such underground reservoir;

A map prepared by a qualified engineer or geologist showing the location, extent, and depth of the proposed underground reservoir and of all wells drilled or proposed to be drilled to such reservoir; and

Such other information as will provide a clear and concise presentation of the matters relevant to the application.

Upon the filing of the application, the commission shall fix a date for a hearing thereon, and the applicant shall thereupon cause notice of such hearing and a copy of the application to be filed with the Department of Natural Resources, accompanied by an examination fee of $200.00. Notice of such hearing and a copy of the application shall be served upon the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources and upon the state geologist of the Geologic Surveys Branch of the Environmental Protection Division. The applicant shall also cause notice of such hearing to be given by publishing notice thereof at least once each week for three successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties wherein the gas is proposed to be stored, the first such publication to be made at least 21 days prior to the date of the hearing.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-805, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.

46-4-54.
Investigation by state geologist of site of proposed storage project; procedures involving state geologist; investigation of proposed storage project by director of Environmental Protection Division; procedures involving director; investigation of proposed storage project by commission.

Upon receiving the notice of the hearing and the copy of the application, the state geologist shall immediately initiate an investigation of the site of the proposed storage project for the purpose of determining the facts involved in the findings which the Public Service Commission is required to consider in preparing an order under Code Section 46-4-55 and for the purpose of such other matters as the state geologist or the Public Service Commission may deem relevant in evaluating the feasibility and safety features of the proposed underground storage project. The gas utility shall make available to the state geologist for his consideration and evaluation all geological and reservoir engineering studies and other information in the utility’s possession concerning the proposed underground storage project. The state geologist shall complete his investigation and shall file a written report of same with the Public Service Commission prior to the date of the hearing. The state geologist and any members of his staff having knowledge of the investigation may be called as witnesses at the hearing.

Upon receiving the notice of the hearing and the copy of the application, the director of the Environmental Protection Division shall immediately initiate an investigation of the proposed storage project for the purpose of determining whether such project will injure, pollute, or contaminate any usable fresh-water resources. The director shall complete his investigation and shall file a written report of same with the Public Service Commission prior to the date of the hearing. The director and any member of his staff having knowledge of the investigation may be called as witnesses at the hearing.

At any time after the filing of the application under Code Section 46-4-53, but prior to the time of entering an order approving or disapproving same, the commission may conduct an investigation of the site of the proposed underground storage project for the purpose of determining any matters relevant to the consideration of such application or may cause such investigation to be made by an independent qualified engineer or geologist, or both, selected by the commission and paid by the gas utility.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-806, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.

46-4-55.
Receipt and recording of evidence at hearing on application; order of commission approving or disapproving underground storage project.

At the hearing on an application made pursuant to Code Section 46-4-53, the commission shall receive, hear, and make a record of such relevant evidence on the issues as may be offered by any person directly interested and shall enter an order either approving or disapproving the proposed underground storage project.

Any order approving a proposed underground storage project shall contain and be based on findings that:

The proposed underground storage of gas is in the public interest and welfare;

The underground reservoir is reasonably practicable and suitable for the underground storage of gas, and the applicant has complied with all applicable conservation laws of the State of Georgia;

The underground reservoir is nonproductive of economically recoverable valuable minerals or materials or of oil or gas in commercial quantities under either primary or secondary recovery methods and nonproductive of fresh water in commercial quantities with feasible and reasonable pumping lift;

The underground storage project will not injure, pollute, or contaminate any usable fresh-water resources;

The underground storage project will not injure, interfere with, or endanger any mineral resources or the development or extraction thereof; and

The gas utility carries public liability insurance, or has deposited collateral in amounts satisfactory to the commission, or has furnished a financial statement showing assets in an amount satisfactory to the commission, so as to demonstrate the ability of the gas utility to secure payment of any liability resulting from any reasonably anticipated occurrence which may arise out of or be caused by the operation or use of any underground reservoir or facilities incidental thereto.

The issuance of an order of approval by the commission shall be a condition precedent to the utilization or operation of an underground gas storage project. The commission may attach to the order such terms, conditions, and restrictions as it deems appropriate in the public interest.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-807, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.

46-4-56.
Judicial review of commission’s order.

Any party appearing at the hearing who is directly affected by an order of the commission approving or disapproving a proposed underground storage project considered at such hearing shall have the right to judicial review of the order by filing a petition with the Superior Court of Fulton County within 30 days after the entry of the order by the commission. In the event no such petition is filed within such time, the order of the commission shall be final and conclusive. In such action the burden of proof shall be upon the party complaining of such order, and such order shall be deemed prima facie valid. Any person directly interested in the subject matter may, in the discretion of the court, be permitted to intervene in such action. Any party to such action may offer in evidence all or any part of the record of the hearing before the commission and any other relevant evidence. The practice, pleading, and proceedings in such action shall be equitable in nature. The court shall have jurisdiction to enter a decree affirming or setting aside such order or remanding the cause to the commission with directions to modify such order so that it shall conform to this article. Such action shall have precedence over other matters before the court. Appeals may be taken by any party to such action in the same manner and to the same extent as in other civil actions.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-808, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.

46-4-57.
Exercise of right of eminent domain by gas utilities.

Any gas utility shall have the right of eminent domain, to be exercised in the manner provided in Title 22, to acquire for its use any underground reservoir for the storage of gas, as well as such other property or interests in property as may be required to explore adequately for, examine, prepare, maintain, utilize, and operate such underground reservoir for the storage of gas, including easements and rights of way for access to and egress from such underground storage reservoir.

Without limiting the generality of subsection (a) of this Code section, a gas utility may condemn the following rights in property for use in connection with the underground storage of gas:

The right to conduct such operations, including the drilling of test holes or wells, as may be necessary or convenient to determine the suitability of a geological stratum or formation for the underground storage of gas;

The right to lay, operate, and maintain pipes and pipelines necessary or convenient for the transportation of gas to and from the underground reservoir;

The right to prepare, establish, maintain, utilize, and operate the underground reservoir for the storage of gas in and the injection of gas into the reservoir and the withdrawal of gas from the reservoir; and

The right to install, operate, and maintain any stations, wells, fixtures, machinery, and other facilities necessary or convenient in connection with any of the operations described in this subsection.

The right of eminent domain granted by this Code section shall apply to property or property interests held by private owners, by the State of Georgia or by any political subdivision of the state, by any municipal corporation, or by any other public or quasi-public body.

Any property or interest therein acquired by any gas utility pursuant to this Code section shall be used exclusively for the purposes for which it was acquired.

The right of eminent domain granted by this Code section is cumulative of any other right of eminent domain now possessed by any gas utility or public utility to condemn property for use in its operations. The power of eminent domain which was granted and conferred by Ga. L. 1929, p. 219, upon persons engaged in constructing or operating pipelines for the transportation or distribution of natural or artificial gas and upon persons engaged in furnishing natural or artificial gas for heating, lighting, or power purposes in this state, and the manner of exercising such power of eminent domain as provided in Chapter 1 of Title 22 and Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 22 is ratified, confirmed, and continued.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-804, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 46.

The 2004 amendment,

effective May 13, 2004, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Provisions corresponding to those enacted by Ga. L. 1929, p. 219, referred to in subsection (e) of this section, are codified at §§

22-1-1

and

22-3-83

.

46-4-58.
Determination of ownership of gas injected into underground storage reservoir; protection of rights of owners of other interests in the land.

All gas which has previously been reduced to possession and which is subsequently injected into an underground storage reservoir shall at all times be deemed the property of the injector, its heirs, successors, or assigns; and in no event shall such gas be subject to any right of the owner of the surface of the land under which such underground reservoir lies, or of the owner of any mineral interest therein, or of any person other than such injector, its heirs, successors, or assigns, to release, produce, take, reduce to possession, or otherwise interfere with or exercise any control thereof; provided, however, that the right of condemnation granted by Code Section 46-4-57 shall be without prejudice to the right of the owner of the condemned land or the owner of any other right or interest therein to drill or bore through the underground reservoir in such a manner as will protect the underground reservoir against pollution and against the escape of gas and as will comply with the order of the commission and the rules and regulations of the Department of Natural Resources issued for the purpose of protecting underground storage; provided, further, that the right of condemnation granted by Code Section 46-4-57 shall be without prejudice to the rights of the owner of such land or the owner of any other right or interest therein as to all other uses thereof.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-811, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.

Cross references.

Extent of surface owner’s title downward and upward, §§

44-1-2

, 51-9-9.

46-4-59.
Effect of abandonment of reservoir by gas utility; evidence of abandonment; approval of abandonment by commission.

When a gas utility which has exercised the power of eminent domain pursuant to Code Section 46-4-57 permanently abandons the entire underground reservoir for the storage of gas, the condemned property shall revert to the then owners of the land, the mineral rights, royalties, and other interests relating to the property in proportion to their several ownership interests. Good faith exploration or development work relative to a proposed or approved underground gas storage project shall be conclusive evidence that such project has not been abandoned. No gas utility shall abandon an underground reservoir for the storage of gas without first receiving an order of the commission approving such abandonment.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-812, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.

46-4-60.
Adoption by Board of Natural Resources of rules and regulations governing construction, installation, utilization, and operation of underground reservoirs and stations, wells, fixtures, and other facilities; enforcement of rules and regulations; inspection and examination.

The Board of Natural Resources shall adopt rules and regulations prescribing minimum standards reasonably necessary for the protection of the health, welfare, and safety of the public. Such rules and regulations shall govern the construction, installation, utilization, and operation of underground reservoirs and the stations, wells, fixtures, machinery, and other facilities used in connection therewith, and shall govern the condition in which such reservoirs and facilities are to be kept. The commissioner of natural resources or any other interested party may commence a civil action for the enforcement of such rules and regulations against any offending gas utility or other party by filing a complaint in the superior court of any county where the whole or any part of a violation of such rules and regulations occurs.

The Department of Natural Resources, shall from time to time inspect and examine the methods of construction, maintenance, utilization, and operation exercised in connection with all underground reservoirs and the stations, wells, fixtures, machinery, and other facilities used in connection therewith, and shall inspect and examine the condition of all such reservoirs and facilities. One such inspection and examination shall be made each calendar year (at a time selected by the commissioner) by an independent qualified engineer employed by the gas utility and approved by the commissioner. A written report of such inspection and examination shall be filed with the commissioner and the Public Service Commission within 30 days after the time selected for the inspection and examination. Whenever the commissioner determines that any such underground reservoir or facility used in connection therewith is unsafe and dangerous, he shall immediately issue a written order to the gas utility responsible therefor directing it to correct such unsafe and dangerous condition within the time specified in the order. If the gas utility fails to comply with such order within the time prescribed, the commissioner may commence an action in the superior court of the county where the whole or any part of such unsafe or dangerous condition exists to compel the correction of same. If the court finds that such order is reasonable and just, it shall enter an appropriate decree compelling obedience to and compliance with such order and may grant such other relief as may be just and proper.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-809, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.

46-4-61.
Adoption by commission of rules, regulations, and orders necessary for enforcement and administration of article; enforcement by injunction, mandamus, and other relief.

The commission is authorized to adopt such rules, regulations, and orders as it deems necessary in the enforcement or administration of this article. The commission is further authorized to enforce this article and the rules, regulations, and orders adopted thereunder by instituting actions for injunction, mandamus, or other appropriate relief.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-810, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.

46-4-62.
Effect of article on authority of Department of Natural Resources.

No provision of this article shall in any way be construed to impair or interfere with the authority of the Department of Natural Resources to prevent or abate injury, pollution, or contamination of any usable fresh-water resources.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-813, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 463, § 1.